Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1283
Land office receipts; effect as evidence.

The usual duplicate receipt of the receiver of any land office, or, if that be lost or destroyed, or beyond the reach of the party, the certificate of such receiver that the books of his office show the sale of a tract of land to a certain individual is proof of title equivalent to a patent against all but the holder of an actual patent.

R.S.1867, Code § 411, p. 462;

R.S.1913, § 7976;

C.S.1922, § 8917;

C.S.1929, § 20-1283;

R.S.1943, § 25-1283.

Holder of receiver's certificate cannot, when entry is canceled, maintain ejectment. Oldfather v. Ericson, 79 Neb. 1, 112 N.W. 356 (1907); Headley v. Coffman, 38 Neb. 68, 56 N.W. 701 (1893).

Land office receipt is sufficient to protect one in possession against naked claim of superior right. Moore v. Parker, 59 Neb. 29, 80 N.W. 43 (1899); Kinney v. Degman, 12 Neb. 237, 11 N.W. 318 (1882).

Receiver's receipt gives color of title to entire tract described. Draper v. Taylor, 58 Neb. 787, 79 N.W. 709 (1899).

United States land officer's certificate is such color of title as to start statute of limitation running. Carroll v. Patrick, 23 Neb. 834, 37 N.W. 671 (1888).